Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 7 Hazardous Substances
8-7-802. Division and commission — Powers and duties.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To promulgate, after notice and public hearing, and to modify, repeal, and enforce, as necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the purposes and intent of this subchapter, rules relating to an underground storage tank release detection, prevention, corrective action, and financial responsibility program as required by the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., and the Energy Policy Act of 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-58; and

To set reasonable fees for licensure of individuals and annual registration of underground storage tanks and aboveground storage tanks by rule.

The annual registration fee for underground storage tanks shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00) per underground storage tank.

The fee shall be used by the Division of Environmental Quality for administrative and program costs.

The annual registration fee for aboveground storage tanks shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00) per aboveground storage tank.

The fee shall be used by the Division of Environmental Quality for administrative and program costs, and ten dollars ($10.00) of the fee collected by the Division of Environmental Quality shall be remitted to the State Treasury, there to be deposited as special revenues to the credit of the Division of Arkansas State Police Fund to be used for the purposes of above-ground storage tank monitoring and regulation by the Division of Arkansas State Police.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall have the following powers and duties:

To administer and enforce all laws, rules, and regulations relating to an underground storage tank release detection, prevention, and corrective action program, and financial responsibility, including the use of any and all appropriate legal remedies, to recover costs and collect penalties under this subchapter;

To advise, consult, cooperate, and enter into agreements with appropriate federal, state, interstate, and local units of government and with affected groups and industries in the formulation of plans and in implementation of a program pursuant to this subchapter;

To accept and administer loans and grants from the United States Government and from such other sources as may be available to the Division of Environmental Quality for the planning, implementation, and enforcement of an underground storage tank program for release detection, prevention, corrective action, and financial responsibility;

To examine and license individuals for the installation and testing of underground storage tanks;

To enter upon any public or private property for the purpose of obtaining information, conducting surveys or investigations, or taking corrective action, and the Division of Environmental Quality may copy or require submission of books, papers, records, memoranda, or data pertaining to the management of underground storage tanks;

To enter into a cooperative agreement with the United States Environmental Protection Agency to carry out corrective actions and enforcement activities, including use of funds provided from the federal Leaking Underground Storage Tank Trust Fund, 26 U.S.C. § 9508; and

To take such other action as necessary and appropriate to carry out the purposes of this subchapter and meet the requirements of federal law.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 2; 1991, No. 594, § 1; 1993, No. 810, § 2; 2005, No. 671, § 1; 2007, No. 264, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 644, 645; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2782-2786.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment inserted “and the Energy Policy Act of 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-58” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(1); and deleted “or regulation” following “rule” in (a)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” throughout the section; and, in (a)(2)(C)(ii), substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police Fund” for “Department of Arkansas State Police Fund”, and “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police”.

U.S. Code.

Sections 1521 through 1533 of the Energy Policy Act of 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-58, referred to in this section, concern underground storage tanks and are codified at 42 U.S.C. § 6991 et seq.

Cross References.

Department of Arkansas State Police Fund, § 19-6-404.

8-7-803. Rules generally.

Any rules promulgated under this subchapter shall as much as possible be identical to and no more stringent than the federal regulations adopted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 646.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Rules” for “Regulations” in the section heading; and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the text.

8-7-804. Procedures generally.

The procedure of the Division of Environmental Quality and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission for issuance of rules, conduct of hearings, notice, power of subpoena, review of action on permits, right of appeal, presumptions, finality of actions, and related matters shall be as provided in §§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106 and 8-4-201 — 8-4-229, including, but not limited to, §§ 8-4-205, 8-4-210, 8-4-212 — 8-4-214, and 8-4-218 — 8-4-229 to the extent they are not in conflict with the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 4; 1993, No. 810, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 647; 2019, No. 910, § 2787.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-7-805. License requirement.

It shall be unlawful for an individual to certify the installation or testing of an underground storage tank unless the individual has been duly licensed by the Division of Environmental Quality.

Furthermore, no licensee shall install, remove, repair, close, upgrade, or test any underground storage tank unless the licensee or the contracting company by whom he or she is employed has purchased a surety bond, letter of credit, or cash bond:

In the amount of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000); and

Which provides that the division is the obligee or payee of the instrument and otherwise complies with the rules promulgated under this subchapter.

The surety bond shall be issued by a company authorized to do business in the State of Arkansas and executed by an Arkansas agent.

Licensees whose installation or testing activities are limited to their own or their employers' companies' underground storage tanks are exempt from the requirement to meet the financial responsibility requirements provided by this section.

In the event the licensee or contracting company fails to properly install, remove, repair, close, upgrade, or test any underground storage tank pursuant to state law or rule, the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality shall commence proceedings to collect on the surety bond, letter of credit, or cash bond on which the division is the obligee or payee.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 5; 1991, No. 1186, § 1; 1993, No. 1019, § 1; 1999, No. 601, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 106; 2003, No. 1203, § 1; 2005, No. 193, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 648, 649; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2788-2790.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(1)(B); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a) and (d); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1)(B) and (d).

8-7-806. Penalties — Enforcement.

It shall be unlawful for any person:

To violate any provision of this subchapter or any rule adopted under this subchapter;

To knowingly make a false statement, representation, or certification in any report or other document submitted under or required by this subchapter or the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund Act, § 8-7-901 et seq., or any rule issued pursuant thereto; or

To violate any order issued by the Division of Environmental Quality under this subchapter or any provision of any such order.

Any person who knowingly makes a false statement, representation, or certification as described in subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each such violation.

Any owner or operator who fails to give any notification regarding storage tanks required by this subchapter or any rule issued pursuant to this subchapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each storage tank for which notification is not given.

Any person who violates any provision of this subchapter or of any rule, permit, certification, license, plan, or order issued pursuant thereto or who commits an unlawful act under this section may be assessed an administrative civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation or unlawful act.

Each day of a continuing violation or unlawful act may be deemed a separate violation or unlawful act for purposes of civil penalty assessment.

If the violation or unlawful act concerns the operation of an underground storage tank, the civil penalty shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each underground storage tank for each day of violation or unlawful action.

No civil penalty may be assessed until the person charged with the violation or unlawful act has been given the opportunity for a hearing in accordance with rules adopted by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

The administrative procedures set forth in § 8-7-804 may be used to recover all costs, expenses, and damages to the division and any other agency or subdivision of the state in enforcing or effectuating the provisions of this subchapter, including, but not limited to, natural resource damages.

The division is authorized to institute a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction to accomplish any or all of the following:

Restrain any violation of or compel compliance with the provisions of this subchapter or of any rule, permit, certification, license, plan, or order issued pursuant to this subchapter or restrain the commission of any unlawful act under this section;

Affirmatively order that remedial measures be taken as may be necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the purposes and intent of this subchapter;

Recover all costs, expenses, and damages to the division and any other agency or subdivision of the state in enforcing or effectuating the provisions of this subchapter, including, but not limited to, natural resource damages;

Assess civil penalties in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for violations of this subchapter or of any rule, permit, certification, license, plan, or order issued pursuant to this subchapter or for any unlawful act under this section;

Recover civil penalties assessed pursuant to subsection (d) of this section; or

Forfeit a surety bond purchased pursuant to this subchapter.

All civil penalties collected under this section shall be deposited into the Regulated Substance Storage Tank Program Fund.

All moneys collected which represent the costs, expenses, or damages of another agency or subdivision of the state shall be distributed to the appropriate governmental entity.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 6; 1993, No. 810, § 4; 2003, No. 486, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 650-655; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2791-2794.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “or regulation” following “rule” twice in (a); substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (c); deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (d)(1), (e)(1), and (e)(4); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(3); and substituted “division” for “department” in (d)(5) and throughout (e).

8-7-807. Responsibility and liability of owner.

Upon a determination that a release of a regulated substance from a storage tank has occurred, the owner or operator shall notify the Division of Environmental Quality. The owner or operator shall immediately undertake to collect and remove the release and to restore the area affected in accordance with the requirements of this subchapter.

However, the obligation of an owner or operator of an aboveground storage tank to notify the division or undertake the other activities required in this subsection shall not exceed and will be limited to the existing requirements of any other applicable federal statutes or regulations, or state statutes or rules.

If the owner or operator fails to proceed as required in subsection (a) of this section, the owner and operator shall be liable to the division for any costs incurred by the division for undertaking corrective action or enforcement action with respect to the release of a regulated substance from a storage tank.

A release site property owner or adjacent property owner shall not unduly impede or interfere with the efforts of the division or the owner or operator to undertake investigation, site assessment, or corrective action in accordance with the requirements of this subchapter.

The division or the owner, as defined in § 8-7-801, or operator shall undertake investigation, site assessment, or corrective action, as approved by the division after notice to the affected parties, that minimizes to the most reasonable extent practicable any interference with the release site property owner's or adjacent property owner's use and enjoyment of the property, taking into consideration the relevant private and commercial interests and the release site property owner's or adjacent property owner's need for access.

A release site property owner or adjacent property owner that violates subdivision (c)(1) of this section is liable for any investigation, site assessment, or corrective action costs resulting from the violation.

If the release site property owner or adjacent property owner denies access to property when the access is reasonably necessary for investigation, site assessment, or corrective action undertaken by the division or by the owner or operator under a division directive, order, or approved corrective action plan, the division may order the release site property owner or adjacent property owner to undertake the portion of investigation, site assessment, or corrective action that was prohibited by the denial of access.

This section does not impair any right of the release site property owner or adjacent property owner to seek equitable or legal remedies, including without limitation claims for trespass, compensation as the result of eminent domain, damages for temporary or permanent takings of rights in land, contribution, and any other right or remedy allowed by state law or rule, or federal law or regulation.

Any party found liable for any costs or expenditures recoverable under this subchapter which establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that only a portion of such costs or expenditures are attributable to his or her actions shall be required to pay only for that portion.

If the trier of fact finds the evidence insufficient to establish each party's portion of costs or expenditures, the court shall apportion the costs or expenditures, to the extent practicable, according to equitable principles, among the responsible parties.

In any action under this subchapter, no responsible party shall be liable for more than that party's apportioned share of the amount of costs or expenditures recoverable for the site.

Any expenditures required under this subchapter made by a responsible party, before or after suit or before or after a complaint has been filed with or heard by the Arkansas State Claims Commission, shall be credited toward any apportioned share.

Any costs recovered by the division under this section shall be used to reimburse the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund in the amount utilized by the division and the balance, if any, deposited into the Regulated Substance Storage Tank Program Fund.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 7; 1993, No. 810, § 5; 1999, No. 600, § 2; 2013, No. 1509, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 656, 657; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2795, 2796.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “federal statutes or regulations, or state statutes or rules” for “federal or state statutes or regulations” in (a)(2); and inserted “law or rule” in (c)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the first sentence of (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Cross References.

Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund, §§ 8-7-905 and 19-5-959.

8-7-808. Regulated Substance Storage Tank Program Fund.

There is hereby established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the “Regulated Substance Storage Tank Program Fund”. Such Regulated Substance Storage Tank Program Fund shall consist of federal funds, any necessary state matching funds as may be provided by the General Assembly, licensure fees, annual registration fees, and any moneys recovered by the Division of Environmental Quality which are attributable to collections of civil penalties under § 8-7-806 or to costs under § 8-7-807 not owed the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund. All said moneys shall be deposited as special revenues to be used in the administration of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 2797.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the second sentence.

Cross References.

Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund, §§ 8-7-905 and 19-5-959.

Regulated Substance Storage Tank Program Fund, § 19-6-463.

8-7-809. Corrective actions — Orders of director.

Nothing in this subchapter or the rules promulgated under this subchapter shall prevent any person from undertaking corrective action which would provide reasonable protection of public health and safety and the environment.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subchapter, the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, upon finding that the release may present an imminent and substantial hazard to the health of persons or to the environment and that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health and welfare or the environment may, without notice or hearing, issue an order reciting the existence of such an imminent hazard and emergency and requiring that such action be taken as he or she determines to be necessary to protect the health of such persons or the environment and to meet the emergency.

The order of the director may include, but is not limited to, directing the owner or operator of the site which constitutes the hazard to take such steps as are necessary to prevent the act or eliminate the practice which constitutes the hazard, and, with respect to a facility or site, the director may order cessation of operation.

Any person to whom the order is directed shall comply with it immediately, but, upon written application to the director within ten (10) days of the issuance of the order, that person shall be afforded a hearing before the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission within ten (10) days after receipt of the written request.

On the basis of the hearing, the commission shall continue the order in effect or shall revoke or modify it.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 9; 1993, No. 810, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 658; 2019, No. 910, § 2798.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(1).

8-7-810. Insurance pools.

Owners or operators of storage tanks who are unable to demonstrate financial responsibility in the minimum amounts specified by the Division of Environmental Quality may establish an insurance pool in order to demonstrate such financial responsibility.

The formation and operation of an insurance pool under this section shall be subject to approval by the Insurance Commissioner, who shall, after notice and hearing, establish through rules a method for approval and monitoring of such insurance pools.

Such rules may include:

Provisions for periodic examinations of financial condition, including inspection of books, papers, accounts, and affairs of the plan;

Conditions for participation in the plan;

Minimum amounts of cash reserves and insurance coverage to be acquired;

Requirements for sound management of the plan;

Grounds for suspension or withdrawal of approval of the plan; and

Grounds for termination of the plan.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 10; 2019, No. 315, § 659; 2019, No. 910, § 2799.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the introductory language of (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a).

8-7-811. Trade secrets.

Any records, reports, or information obtained by the Department of Energy and Environment, the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment, or the Division of Environmental Quality or by the department’s or division’s employees in the administration of this subchapter, except release data, shall be kept confidential upon a showing satisfactory to the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality that the records, reports, or information would constitute a trade secret under § 4-75-601 et seq.

As necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter, information afforded confidential treatment may be transmitted under a continuing claim of confidentiality to other officers or employees of the state or of the United States if the owner or operator of the facility to which the information pertains is informed of the transmittal and if the information has been acquired by the division under the provisions of this subchapter.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the division's authority to release confidential information during emergency situations.

Any violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 11; 1993, No. 810, § 7; 2019, No. 693, § 23; 2019, No. 910, § 2800.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “is a Class A” for “shall be unlawful and shall constitute a” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 rewrote (a); and substituted “division’s” for “department’s” in (b) and (c).

Cross References.

Misdemeanors, § 5-1-107.

8-7-812. Subchapter controlling over other laws.

This subchapter shall supersede and preempt all local government laws, ordinances, rules, and regulations pertaining to underground storage tanks, except for any applicable local building permit or fire code requirements pertaining to installation of underground storage tanks.

The provisions of this subchapter and the rules promulgated pursuant to this subchapter shall govern if they conflict with the provisions of the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq., the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., or the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq., or any action taken by the Division of Environmental Quality under the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq., the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq., or the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 12; 2019, No. 315, § 660; 2019, No. 910, § 2801.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “rules” in (a); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b).

8-7-813. Registration.

Except as provided under subsections (e) and (f) of this section, all owners and operators of storage tanks shall register their storage tanks as required by federal regulations and in accordance with the rules adopted under this subchapter.

Except as provided under subsections (e) and (f) of this section, all owners and operators shall maintain proof of current and proper registration at the registered facility and post the proof in a conspicuous place on-site.

Proof of registration shall be in the form determined by rules adopted under this subchapter.

If a storage tank is required to be registered under this subchapter, the owner or operator shall not receive any regulated substance into any storage tank for which current and proper proof of registration has not been provided to the person selling the regulated substance.

A person selling any regulated substance shall not deliver or cause to be delivered a regulated substance into any storage tank for which he or she has not obtained current and proper proof of registration from the owner or operator.

Any person violating this section is subject to § 8-7-806.

This subchapter does not apply to aboveground storage tanks located on farms, the contents of which are used for agricultural purposes and not held for resale.

An aboveground storage tank that contains petroleum may be registered under this subchapter at the option of the owner or operator for the purpose of allowing potential eligibility for reimbursement under the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund Act, § 8-7-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 810, § 8; 2017, No. 584, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 661, 662.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added “Except as provided under subsections (e) and (f) of this section” in (a) and (b)(1); substituted “shall” for “must” in (a) and (b)(1); substituted “under this subchapter” for “hereunder” in (a) and (b)(2); in (c)(1), substituted “If a storage tank is required to be registered under this subchapter, the” for “No” and inserted “not” following “shall”; in (c)(2), substituted “A person” for “Neither shall any person”, and inserted “shall not” preceding “deliver”; substituted “this section is subject to” for “any provision of this section shall be subject to the provisions of” in (d); substituted “This subchapter does not” for “The provisions of this subchapter shall not” in (e); and added (f).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a) and (b)(2).

8-7-814. Delivery prohibition.

It shall be unlawful to deliver to, deposit into, or accept a regulated substance into an underground storage tank at a facility that has been identified by the Division of Environmental Quality to be ineligible for fuel delivery or deposit.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall adopt rules to implement the criteria and process required by the delivery prohibition requirements of the Energy Policy Act of 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-58, and the rules shall consist of, at a minimum, the federal guidelines for determining the significant operational compliance of underground storage tank systems.

In order to prevent the delivery of a regulated substance into an underground storage tank system that has been identified by the division to be ineligible for fuel delivery or deposit, the division shall affix a tamper-proof tag, seal, or other device blocking the fill pipes of the ineligible underground storage tank. This affixed notice shall serve as written notification to the owner, the operator, and the product delivery industry.

No owner or operator shall receive any regulated substance into any underground storage tank to which notification of delivery prohibition has been affixed.

No person selling any regulated substance shall deliver or cause to be delivered a regulated substance into any underground storage tank to which notification of delivery prohibition has been affixed.

It shall be unlawful for any person, other than an authorized representative of the division, to remove, tamper with, destroy, or damage a device affixed to any underground storage tank by division personnel.

Any person violating any provision of this section shall be subject to an assessment of an administrative civil penalty as set forth in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 505, § 1; 2007, No. 264, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 663.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “Delivery prohibition” for “Upgrade compliance” in the section heading, and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” twice in (b).

U.S. Code.

Relevant provisions of the Energy Policy Act of 2005, Pub. L. No. 109-58, referred to in this section, are codified at 42 U.S.C. § 6991 et seq.

8-7-815. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning storage tank self-inspection audit, was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 282, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 2001, No. 1471, §
2.

8-7-816. Secondary containment.

Each new underground storage tank or piping connected to any new underground storage tank shall be secondarily contained and monitored for leaks.

In the case of a new underground storage tank system consisting of one (1) or more underground storage tanks and connected by piping, the requirement to provide secondary containment shall apply to all underground storage tanks and connected pipes comprising such underground storage tank system.

Any existing underground storage tank or existing piping connected to an existing underground storage tank that is replaced shall be secondarily contained and monitored for leaks.

In the case of a replacement of an existing underground storage tank or existing piping connected to the underground storage tank, the requirement to provide secondary containment shall apply only to the specific underground storage tank or piping being replaced, not to other underground storage tanks and connected pipes comprising such underground storage tank system.

Each installation of a new motor fuel dispenser system or replacement of an existing motor fuel dispenser system shall include under-dispenser spill containment.

A motor fuel dispenser system is considered to have been replaced when an existing motor fuel dispenser and the equipment necessary to connect the motor fuel dispenser to the underground storage tank system are removed and another motor fuel dispenser and the equipment necessary to connect the motor fuel dispenser to the underground storage tank system are put in its place.

All secondary containment installed shall comply with federal regulations for underground storage tanks and the rules adopted under this subchapter.

Any person violating any provision of this section shall be subject to the provisions of § 8-7-806.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 264, § 4; 2017, No. 534, §§ 1-4; 2019, No. 315, § 664.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(1), deleted “installed after July 1, 2007” following the second occurrence of “tank” and deleted “if the new underground storage tank or piping is within one thousand feet (1,000') of any existing community water system or any existing potable drinking water well” at the end; in (b)(1), deleted “after July 1, 2007” following “replaced” and deleted “if the replaced underground storage tank or piping is within one thousand feet (1,000') of any existing community water system or any existing potable drinking water well” at the end; repealed (b)(3); in (c)(1), deleted “after July 1, 2007” following the second occurrence of “system” and deleted “if the new or replaced dispenser is within one thousand feet (1,000') of any existing community water system or any existing potable drinking water well” at the end; and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d).

8-7-817. Operator training.

All operators of underground storage tank systems shall complete training in the operation and maintenance of underground storage tank systems in accordance with rules promulgated under this section.

For purposes of compliance with this section, the following persons shall be considered “operators” required to receive operator training:

Persons having primary responsibility for on-site operation and maintenance of underground storage tank systems;

Persons having daily on-site responsibility for the operation and maintenance of underground storage tank systems; and

Daily on-site employees having primary responsibility for addressing emergencies presented by a spill or release from an underground storage tank system.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 264, § 5; 2019, No. 315, § 665.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a).